Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 5. Prohibitions and Penalties.

Administrative Code. —

For rules of professional conduct, see 12 AAC 60, art. 4.

Sec. 08.86.170.
Use of title.

Unless licensed under this chapter, a person may not use the title “psychologist” or a title, designation, or device indicating or tending to indicate that the person is a psychologist or practices psychology.

Unless licensed under this chapter, a person may not use the title “psychological associate” or a title, designation, or device indicating or tending to indicate that the person is a psychological associate or practices counseling or psychometrics.

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1967; am § 6 ch 65 SLA 1973)

Cross references. —

For professional designation requirements for psychologists, see AS

08.02.010

.

Sec. 08.86.180.
Practice of psychology.

Unless licensed under this chapter, a person may not practice psychology or hold out publicly as a psychologist or as practicing psychology. A person holds out as a psychologist by using a title or description of services incorporating the words “psychology,” “psychological,” “psychologist,” “psychometry,” “psychotherapy,” “psychotherapeutic,” “psychotherapist,” “psychoanalysis,” or “psychoanalyst” or when holding out publicly to be trained, experienced, or qualified to render services in the field of psychology.

This section does not apply to

a person employed as a school psychologist, if the school district maintains appropriate supervision of psychological activities and professional conduct, and if the person is performing the psychological activities as part of the duties for which the person was employed, is performing the activities solely within the facilities of the school district in which the person is employed or under the supervision of the school district, and does not render or offer to render psychological services to the public for compensation in addition to the salary the person receives from the school district;

an officer or employee of the United States government practicing psychology while in the discharge of the officer’s or employee’s official duties;

a student, intern, or resident in psychology pursuing a course of study approved by the board as qualifying training and experience for a psychologist, if that person’s activities constitute a part of that person’s supervised course of study and that person is designated by titles such as “psychology intern” or “psychology trainee”;

a qualified member of another profession, in doing work of a psychological nature consistent with that person’s training and consistent with the code of ethics of that person’s profession, if the person does not hold out to the public by a title or description of services incorporating the words “psychology,” “psychological,” “psychologist,” “psychometry,” “psychotherapy,” “psychotherapeutic,” “psychotherapist,” “psychoanalysis,” or “psychoanalyst” or represent to be trained, experienced, or qualified to render services in the field of psychology; or

a physician engaged in the normal practice of medicine for which the physician is licensed under AS 08.64.

Nothing in this chapter authorizes a person licensed as a psychologist to engage in the practice of medicine, as defined by the laws of the state.

Nothing in this section prohibits a licensed clinical social worker, a licensed marital and family therapist, or a licensed professional counselor from holding out to the public by a title or description of services incorporating the words “psychoanalysis,” “psychoanalyst,” “psychotherapy,” “psychotherapist,” or “psychotherapeutic.”

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1967; am § 10 ch 69 SLA 1970; am §§ 7, 15 ch 65 SLA 1973; am §§ 14, 15 ch 58 SLA 1980; am §§ 4, 5 ch 29 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 26 SLA 2010; am § 5 ch 8 SLA 2011)

Sec. 08.86.185.
Practice of counseling and psychometrics. [Repealed, § 24 ch 58 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 08.86.180.]

Sec. 08.86.190.
Name under which person practices.

A licensed psychologist may practice psychology only under that person’s own name.

A licensed psychological associate may practice counseling or psychometry only under that person’s own name.

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1967; am § 9 ch 64 SLA 1973)

Sec. 08.86.200.
Confidentiality of communication.

A psychologist or psychological associate may not reveal to another person a communication made to the psychologist or psychological associate by a client about a matter concerning which the client has employed the psychologist or psychological associate in a professional capacity. This section does not apply to

a case conference with other mental health professionals or with physicians and surgeons;

a case in which the client in writing authorized the psychologist or psychological associate to reveal a communication;

a case where an immediate threat of serious physical harm to an identifiable victim is communicated to a psychologist or psychological associate by a client;

disclosures of confidential communications required under Rule 504, Alaska Rules of Evidence; or

proceedings conducted by the board or the department where the disclosure of confidential communications is necessary to defend against charges that the psychologist or psychological associate has violated provisions of this chapter; information obtained by the board or department under this paragraph is confidential and is not a public record for purposes of AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a psychologist or psychological associate shall report to the appropriate authority incidents of child abuse or neglect as required by AS

47.17.020

, incidents of abuse of a vulnerable adult as required by AS

47.24.010

, and incidents of abuse of disabled persons disclosed to the psychologist or psychological associate by a client. In this subsection “disabled person” means a person who has a physical or mental disability or a physical or mental impairment, as defined in AS

18.80.300

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1967; am § 10 ch 65 SLA 1973; am § 7 ch 63 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 2 ch 102 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 129 SLA 1994; am § 7 ch 51 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

.

Sec. 08.86.204.
Grounds for imposition of disciplinary sanctions.

After a hearing, the board may impose a disciplinary sanction on a person licensed under this chapter when the board finds that the licensee

secured a license through deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation;

engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation in the course of providing professional services or engaging in professional activities;

advertised professional services in a false or misleading manner;

has been convicted of a felony or other crime that affects the licensee’s ability to continue to practice competently and safely;

intentionally or negligently engaged in or permitted the performance of patient care by persons under the licensee’s supervision that does not conform to minimum professional standards regardless of whether actual injury to the patient occurred;

failed to comply with this chapter, with a regulation adopted under this chapter, or with an order of the board;

continued to practice after becoming unfit due to

professional incompetence;

failure to keep informed of current professional practices;

addiction or severe dependency on alcohol or other drugs which impairs the ability to practice safely;

physical or mental disability or a combination of physical and mental disabilities;

engaged in sexual misconduct with a patient during the course of therapy, either within or outside the treatment setting, or within two years after therapy or counseling with the patient has terminated; in this paragraph, “sexual misconduct” includes sexual contact, as defined in regulations adopted under this chapter, or attempted sexual contact, regardless of the patient’s or former patient’s consent or lack of consent.

The board may summarily suspend the license of a licensee who refuses to submit to a physical or mental examination under AS

08.86.075

. A person whose license is suspended under this subsection is entitled to a hearing conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) within seven days after the effective date of the order. If, after the hearing, the board upholds the suspension, the licensee may appeal the suspension to a court of competent jurisdiction.

The board may not impose disciplinary sanctions on a licensee for the evaluation, diagnosis, or treatment of a person through audio, video, or data communications when physically separated from the person if

the licensee or another licensed health care provider is available to provide follow-up care;

the licensee requests that the person consent to sending a copy of all records of the encounter to a primary care provider if the licensee is not the person’s primary care provider and, if the person consents, the licensee sends the records to the person’s primary care provider; and

the licensee meets the requirements established by the board in regulation.

The board shall adopt regulations restricting the evaluation, diagnosis, supervision, and treatment of a person as authorized under (c) of this section by establishing standards of care, including standards for training, confidentiality, supervision, practice, and related issues.

History.

(§ 16 ch 58 SLA 1980; am §§ 8, 9 ch 51 SLA 1996; am § 20 ch 163 SLA 2004; am § 14 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For disciplinary powers of board, see AS

08.01.075

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 19, 2016, added (c) and (d).

Sec. 08.86.206.
Disciplinary sanctions. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.075.]

Sec. 08.86.210.
Penalty.

A person who violates this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1967; am § 11 ch 65 SLA 1973; am § 17 ch 58 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Administrative Code. —

For rules of professional conduct, see 12 AAC 60, art. 4.

Sec. 08.86.220.
Limits or conditions on license; discipline.

Upon a finding that by reason of demonstrated problems of competence, experience, education, or health the authority to practice psychology or as a psychological associate under this chapter should be limited or conditioned or the practitioner disciplined, the board may reprimand, censure, place on probation, restrict practice by time, specialty, procedure or facility, require additional education or training, or revoke or suspend a license.

AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to any action taken by the board under this section.

History.

(§ 32 ch 102 SLA 1976)